dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- दिलाउ; दिलाउ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="दिलाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छाडि; छाडि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छाडि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिनोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वेच्; वेच्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वेच्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टाँस्; टाँस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टाँस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उठाइ; उठाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उठाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कस्; कस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थाप्; थाप्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थाप्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भासि; भासि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भासि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुन; सुन; 5 -->
    <pardef n="सुन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िहाल्नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चियाउ; चियाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चियाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उर्; उर्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उर्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लंदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूँ; रूँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रूँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सवबगाउं; सवबगाउं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सवबगाउं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पार्नु; पार्नु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पार्नु__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गरिरहेछन्; गरिरहेछन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गरिरहेछन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छुट्टाउ; छुट्टाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छुट्टाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भर्भराउँ; भर्भराउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भर्भराउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घुसार्; घुसार्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घुसार्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढाक; ढाक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढाक__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाक्का; वाक्का; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाक्का__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हिजो; हिजो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हिजो__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भन्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आइपुगे; आइपुगे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आइपुगे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्झ; सम्झ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्झ__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्झ; सम्झ; 5 -->
    <pardef n="सम्झ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुपर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झर्; झर्; 3 -->
    <pardef n="झर्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिन्; दिन्; 7 -->
    <pardef n="दिन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>थें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छेस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="दिलाउ"><i>दिलाउ</i><par n="दिलाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छाडि"><i>छाडि</i><par n="छाडि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वेच्"><i>वेच्</i><par n="वेच्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="टाँस्"><i>टाँस्</i><par n="टाँस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उठाइ"><i>उठाइ</i><par n="उठाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्"><i>कस्</i><par n="कस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थाप्"><i>थाप्</i><par n="थाप्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भासि"><i>भासि</i><par n="भासि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन"><i>सुन</i><par n="सुन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चियाउ"><i>चियाउ</i><par n="चियाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उर्"><i>उर्</i><par n="उर्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रूँ"><i>रूँ</i><par n="रूँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सवबगाउं"><i>सवबगाउं</i><par n="सवबगाउं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पार्नु"><i>पार्नु</i><par n="पार्नु__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरिरहेछन्"><i>गरिरहेछन्</i><par n="गरिरहेछन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छुट्टाउ"><i>छुट्टाउ</i><par n="छुट्टाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भर्भराउँ"><i>भर्भराउँ</i><par n="भर्भराउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घुसार्"><i>घुसार्</i><par n="घुसार्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ढाक"><i>ढाक</i><par n="ढाक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्का"><i>वाक्का</i><par n="वाक्का__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हिजो"><i>हिजो</i><par n="हिजो__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आइपुगे"><i>आइपुगे</i><par n="आइपुगे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्झ"><i>सम्झ</i><par n="सम्झ__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्झ"><i>सम्झ</i><par n="सम्झ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झर्"><i>झर्</i><par n="झर्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिन्"><i>दिन्</i><par n="दिन्__vblex"/></e>
